New York, session 2025-2026, A304.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6833 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6833. Stock emergency contraception. 1. Every pharmacy shall possess 4 and keep in stock emergency contraception. 5 2. For purposes of this section, "emergency contraception" means one 6 or more over the counter drugs, used separately or in combination, to be 7 administered to or self-administered by the patient in a dosage and 8 manner for preventing pregnancy when used after intercourse, found safe 9 and effective for that use by the United States food and drug adminis- 10 tration, and dispensed for that purpose in accordance with professional 11 standards of practice. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00725-01-5